Hawaii statutes.
PART II. TAXES

§431:7-201 Annual and monthly tax statements.
[Section effective until December 31, 2016. For section effective January
1, 2017, see below.] (a) Each authorized insurer shall file with the commissioner
annually, on or before March 1 in each year, a statement signed by a duly authorized
person on its behalf, setting forth the total business transacted, and the amount
of gross premiums reported by the insurer, pursuant to section 431:7-202, during
the year ending on the preceding December 31, from all risks or property resident,
situated, or located within this State, together with such other information as
may be required by the commissioner to determine the taxability of premiums. The
term "gross premiums" as used in this part shall not include consideration
paid for annuities.

(b) Each authorized insurer shall file with the
commissioner monthly, on or before the twentieth day of the calendar month following
the month in which the taxes accrue, a statement signed by a duly authorized person
on its behalf, setting forth the total business transacted and the amount of gross
premiums reported by the insurer, pursuant to section 431:7-202, during the month
from all risks or property resident, situated, or located within this State, together
with other information as may be required by the commissioner to determine the taxability
of premiums.

(c) Any insurer failing or refusing to file the
annual tax statement on or before March 1, or the monthly statement on or before
the twentieth day of the calendar month following the month in which the taxes accrue,
shall be liable for a fine in an amount not less than $100 and not more than $500
for each day of delinquency. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2; am L 1995, c 232, §13;
am L 1998, c 202, §1; am L 2003, c 212, §41; am L 2010, c 22, §10]

§431:7-201 Annual and monthly tax
statements. [Section effective January 1, 2017. For section effective
until December 31, 2016, see above.] (a) Each authorized insurer shall
electronically file with the commissioner annually, on or before March 1 in
each year, a statement signed by a duly authorized person on its behalf,
setting forth the total business transacted, and the amount of gross premiums
reported by the insurer, pursuant to section 431:7-202, during the year ending
on the preceding December 31, from all risks or property resident, situated, or
located within this State, together with such other information as may be
required by the commissioner to determine the taxability of premiums. The term
"gross premiums" as used in this part shall not include consideration
paid for annuities.

(b) Each authorized insurer shall
electronically file with the commissioner monthly, on or before the twentieth
day of the calendar month following the month in which the taxes accrue, a
statement signed by a duly authorized person on its behalf, setting forth the
total business transacted and the amount of gross premiums reported by the
insurer, pursuant to section 431:7-202, during the month from all risks or
property resident, situated, or located within this State, together with other
information as may be required by the commissioner to determine the taxability
of premiums.

(c) Any insurer failing or refusing to
electronically file the annual tax statement on or before March 1, or the
monthly statement on or before the twentieth day of the calendar month
following the month in which the taxes accrue, shall be liable for a fine in an
amount not less than $100 and not more than $500 for each day of delinquency. [L
1987, c 347, pt of §2; am L 1995, c 232, §13; am L 1998, c 202, §1; am L 2003,
c 212, §41; am L 2010, c 22, §10; am L 2016, c 141, §3]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next